Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-1120
Attorney General; duties.

The Attorney General shall post on the Attorney General's website:

(1) Information relating to:

(a) The responsibilities of a controller under the Data Privacy Act;

(b) The responsibilities of a processor under the Data Privacy Act; and

(c) A consumer's rights under the Data Privacy Act; and

(2) An online mechanism through which a consumer may submit a complaint under the Data Privacy Act to the Attorney General.

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 20.
January 1, 2025